Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
465D

BEHAVIOR
ANALYSTS

Section

465D-1 Findings and declaration of necessity

465D-2 Definitions

465D-3 Behavior analyst program; established;
personnel

465D-4 License required

465D-5 Powers and duties of the director

465D-6 Fees; disposition

465D-7 Exemptions

465D-8 Application for licensure

465D-9 Licensure by endorsement

465D-10 Renewal of license

465D-11 Grounds for refusal to renew, reinstate,
or

restore a license and for denial,
revocation,

suspension, or condition of a license

Note

Subject to evaluation, this chapter is repealed effective
June 30, 2021. See §26H-4.

Section 26H-6 shall not apply to this chapter. L 2015, c
199, §4.

Department of education; reports to 2017-2018 legislature on
progress in complying with licensure and certification requirements of this
chapter. L 2016, c 107, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next